Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 12

Cytopathology Services

63-6-1201. Part definitions.

For purposes of this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Cytopathology services” means the examination of cells from fluids, aspirates, washings, brushings or smears, including the Pap test examination performed by a physician or under the supervision of a physician; and

“Onsite medical clinic” means a medical clinic located on the premises of the patient's employer for which cytopathology services are provided and for which a patient has no financial obligation to pay for the cytopathology services.

Acts 2006, ch. 1003, § 6; 2007, ch. 117, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 117, § 3 provided that the commissioner of health is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act, which amended the introductory paragraph and added subdivision (2). The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of title 4, chapter 5.

63-6-1202. Claims, bills or demands for payment for services.

A clinical laboratory or physician, located in this state, or in another state, providing cytopathology services for patients in this state, shall present or cause to be presented a claim, bill or demand for payment for these services only to the following:

The patient directly;

The responsible insurer or other third party payor;

The hospital, public health clinic, nonprofit health clinic ordering the services, or onsite medical clinic;

The referring laboratory, other than a laboratory of a physician's office or group practice that does not perform the technical or professional component of the cytopathology service for which the claim, bill, or demand is presented; or

Governmental agencies or their specified public or private agent, agency, or organization on behalf of the recipient of the services.

Acts 2006, ch. 1003, § 2; 2007, ch. 117, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 117, § 3 provided that the commissioner of health is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act, which amended subdivision (3). The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of title 4, chapter 5.

63-6-1203. Restrictions on solicitation for payment by licensed practitioner.

Except as provided by § 63-6-1206, no licensed practitioner in the state shall, directly or indirectly, charge, bill or otherwise solicit payment for cytopathology services, unless the professional component of the services was rendered personally by the licensed practitioner or under the licensed practitioner's direct supervision in accordance with § 353 of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. § 263a).

Acts 2006, ch. 1003, § 3.

63-6-1204. Reimbursement of licensed practitioner.

No patient, insurer, third party payor, hospital, public health clinic or nonprofit health clinic shall be required to reimburse any licensed practitioner for charges or claims submitted in violation of this part.

Acts 2006, ch. 1003, § 4.

63-6-1205. Assignment of benefits.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to mandate the assignment of benefits for cytopathology services as defined in § 63-6-1201.

Acts 2006, ch. 1003, § 5.

63-6-1206. Referring laboratory.

This part does not prohibit billing of a referring laboratory for cytopathology services in instances where a sample or samples must be sent to another specialist; provided, that, for purposes of this section, “referring laboratory” does not include a laboratory of a physician's office or group practice that does not perform the technical or professional component of the cytopathology service involved.

Acts 2006, ch. 1003, § 7.

63-6-1207. Violations.

The appropriate state licensing board having jurisdiction over any practitioner who may request or provide cytopathology services may revoke, suspend or deny renewal of the license of any practitioner who violates this part.

Acts 2006, ch. 1003, § 8.